trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="opi/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>      <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kanon__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fä__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ego__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="spaniel__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="plums__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="pröjsar/e__n_p">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="p"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ok__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kammarkollegi/um__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fjällpansar__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gelé__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kärande__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bott/en__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nen</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nar</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>narna</l>     <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gluten__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="molo__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rna</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fan__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="os__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="mango">           <i>mango</i><par n="molo__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nödrop">          <i>nödrop</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="jourhavande">     <i>jourhavande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="cockerspaniel">   <i>cockerspaniel</i><par n="spaniel__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="libero">          <i>libero</i><par n="molo__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="arbetssökande">   <i>arbetssökande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kallbad">         <i>kallbad</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="känguru">         <i>känguru</i><par n="molo__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kommunalordförande"><i>kommunalordförande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mumsmums">        <i>mumsmums</i><par n="plums__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="hambo">           <i>hambo</i><par n="molo__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="spaniel">         <i>spaniel</i><par n="spaniel__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kommunalråd">     <i>kommunalråd</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="gårdfarihandlande"><i>gårdfarihandlande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="plums">           <i>plums</i><par n="plums__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="frisbee">         <i>frisbee</i><par n="spaniel__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="benvärmare">      <i>benvärmar</i><par n="pröjsar/e__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="fördrag">         <i>fördrag</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kanon">           <i>kanon</i><par n="kanon__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="besökande">       <i>besökande</i><par n="kärande__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pröjsare">        <i>pröjsar</i><par n="pröjsar/e__n_p"/></e>
<e lm="materialproblem"> <i>materialproblem</i><par n="ok__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fjällpansar">     <i>fjällpansar</i><par n="fjällpansar__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="halo">            <i>halo</i><par n="molo__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="frisyrgelé">      <i>frisyrgelé</i><par n="gelé__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="bollträ">         <i>bollträ</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="klappträ">        <i>klappträ</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="halmstrå">        <i>halmstrå</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="gelé">            <i>gelé</i><par n="gelé__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="sly">             <i>sly</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fä">              <i>fä</i><par n="fä__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dubbelbotten">    <i>dubbelbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="sandbotten">      <i>sandbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="buteljbotten">    <i>buteljbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="klangbotten">     <i>klangbott</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="taggbräken">      <i>taggbräk</i><par n="bott/en__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="aluminium">       <i>alumini</i><par n="opi/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="skiktröntgen">    <i>skiktröntgen</i><par n="fan__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gruppsex">        <i>gruppsex</i><par n="os__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="föregående">      <i>föregående</i><par n="ego__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dagtingan">       <i>dagtingan</i><par n="fan__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kammarkollegium"> <i>kammarkollegi</i><par n="kammarkollegi/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hönsminne">       <i>hönsminne</i><par n="ego__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="piss">            <i>piss</i><par n="os__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ormserum">        <i>ormserum</i><par n="gluten__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="vigselvägran">    <i>vigselvägran</i><par n="fan__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gluten">          <i>gluten</i><par n="gluten__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="världssamvete">   <i>världssamvete</i><par n="ego__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ammonium">        <i>ammoni</i><par n="opi/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="sanningsserum">   <i>sanningsserum</i><par n="gluten__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="box">             <i>box</i><par n="os__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="opium">           <i>opi</i><par n="opi/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="uppfostran">      <i>uppfostran</i><par n="fan__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="treskifte">       <i>treskifte</i><par n="ego__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dagsljus">        <i>dagsljus</i><par n="os__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="duraluminium">    <i>duralumini</i><par n="opi/um__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="inverkan">        <i>inverkan</i><par n="fan__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ferrum">          <i>ferrum</i><par n="gluten__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fotarbete">       <i>fotarbete</i><par n="ego__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="karborundum">     <i>karborundum</i><par n="gluten__n_nt"/></e>
